Hawaii statutes.
§11-323 Organizational report,
noncandidate committee. (a) The noncandidate committee organizational
report shall include:

(1) The committee's name, which shall incorporate the
full name of the sponsoring entity, if any. An acronym or abbreviation may be
used in other communications if the acronym or abbreviation is commonly known
or clearly recognized by the general public. The committee's name shall not
include the name of a candidate;

(2) The committee's address, including web page
address, if any;

(3) The area, scope, or jurisdiction of the
committee;

(4) The name and address of the committee's
sponsoring entity. If the committee does not have a sponsoring entity, the
committee shall specify the trade, profession, or primary interest of contributors
to the committee;

(5) The name, address, telephone number, occupation,
and principal place of business of the chairperson;

(6) The name, address, telephone number, occupation,
and principal place of business of the treasurer and any other officers;

(7) An indication as to whether the committee was
formed to support or oppose a specific ballot question or candidate and, if so,
a brief description of the question or the name of the candidate;

(8) An indication as to whether the committee is a
political party committee;

(9) The name, address, telephone number, occupation,
and principal place of business of the custodian of the books and accounts;

(10) The name and address of the depository
institution in which the committee will maintain its campaign account and each
applicable account number;

(11) A certification by the chairperson and treasurer of
the statements in the organizational report; and

(12) The name, address, employer, and occupation of
each contributor who contributed an aggregate amount of more than $100 to the
noncandidate committee since the last election and the amount and date of
deposit of each such contribution; provided that, for noncandidate committees
making only independent expenditures, if a contribution of more than $10,000 in
the aggregate in an election period is received from an entity other than an
individual, for-profit business entity, or labor union, then the report shall
include:

(A) The internet address where the
contributing entity's disclosure report can be publicly accessed, if the
contributing entity is subject to any state or federal disclosure reporting
requirements regarding the source of the contributing entity's funds;

(B) The name, address, occupation, and
employer of each funding source of $100 or more in the aggregate in an election
period to that contributing entity; or

(C) An acknowledgment that the contributing
entity is not subject to any state or federal disclosure reporting requirements
regarding the source of the contributing entity's funds.

(b) Any change in information previously
reported in the organizational report, with the exception of subsection
(a)(12), shall be electronically filed with the commission within ten days of
the change being brought to the attention of the committee chairperson or
treasurer. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2; am L 2015, c 209, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next